Tennessee statutes. Title 53 Food, Drugs And Cosmetics
Part 4 Criminal Penalties and Enforcement
53-11-417 — 53-11-450. [Reserved.]

The following are subject to forfeiture:

All controlled substances or controlled substance analogues that have been manufactured, distributed, dispensed or acquired in violation of part 3 of this chapter and this part, or title 39, chapter 17, part 4;

All raw materials, products and equipment of any kind that are used, or intended for use, in manufacturing, compounding, processing, delivering, importing or exporting any controlled substance or controlled substance analogue in violation of part 3 of this chapter and this part, or title 39, chapter 17, part 4;

All property that is used, or intended for use, as a container for property described in subdivision (a)(1) or (a)(2);

All conveyances, including aircraft, vehicles or vessels that are used, or are intended for use, to transport, or in any manner to facilitate the transportation, sale or receipt of property described in subdivision (a)(1) or (a)(2), but:

No conveyance used by any person as a common carrier in the transaction of business as a common carrier is subject to forfeiture under this section, unless it appears that the owner or other person in charge of the conveyance is a consenting party or privy to a violation of part 3 of this chapter and this part, or title 39, chapter 17, part 4;

No conveyance is subject to forfeiture under this section by reason of any act or omission established by the owner of the conveyance to have been committed or omitted without the owner's knowledge or consent;

A conveyance is not subject to forfeiture for a violation of § 39-17-418(a) or (b) or § 39-17-425; and

A forfeiture of a conveyance encumbered by a bona fide security interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if the secured party neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or omission;

All books, records, and research products and materials, including formulas, microfilm, tapes and data that are used, or intended for use, in violation of part 3 of this chapter and this part, or title 39, chapter 17, part 4;

Everything of value furnished, or intended to be furnished, in exchange for a controlled substance or controlled substance analogue in violation of the Tennessee Drug Control Act of 1989, compiled in part 3 of this chapter, this part and title 39, chapter 17, part 4, all proceeds traceable to the exchange, and all moneys, negotiable instruments, and securities used, or intended to be used, to facilitate any violation of the Tennessee Drug Control Act;

No property shall be forfeited under subdivision (a)(6)(A), to the extent of the interest of an owner, by reason of any act or omission established by the owner to have been committed or omitted without the owner's knowledge or consent; and

All drug paraphernalia as defined by § 39-17-402.

Property subject to forfeiture under part 3 of this chapter and this part, or title 39, chapter 17, part 4, may be seized by the director of the Tennessee bureau of investigation or the director's authorized representative, agent or employee, the commissioner of safety or the commissioner's authorized representative, agent or employee, or a sheriff, deputy sheriff, municipal law enforcement officer, campus police officer as defined in § 49-7-118, internal affairs director or internal affairs special agent of the department of correction, or constable upon process issued by any circuit or criminal court having jurisdiction over the property. Seizure without process may be made if:

The seizure is incident to an arrest or a search under a search warrant or an inspection under an administrative inspection warrant;

The property subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior judgment in favor of the state in a criminal injunction or forfeiture proceeding based upon part 3 of this chapter and this part, or title 39, chapter 17, part 4;

The director or the director's authorized representative, agent or employee, the commissioner or the commissioner's authorized representative, agent or employee, or a sheriff, deputy sheriff, municipal law enforcement officer, campus police officer as defined in § 49-7-118, internal affairs director or internal affairs special agent of the department of correction, or constable has probable cause to believe that the property is directly or indirectly dangerous to health or safety; or

The director or the director's authorized representative, agent or employee, the commissioner or the commissioner's authorized representative, agent or employee, or a sheriff, deputy sheriff, municipal law enforcement officer, campus police officer as defined in § 49-7-118, internal affairs director or internal affairs special agent of the department of correction, or constable has probable cause to believe that the property was used or is intended to be used in violation of part 3 of this chapter and this part, or title 39, chapter 17, part 4.

In the event of seizure pursuant to subsection (b), proceedings under subsection (d) shall be instituted promptly.

Property taken or detained under this section shall not be subject to replevin, but is deemed to be in the custody of the director or the director's authorized representative, agent or employee, the commissioner or the commissioner's authorized representative, agent or employee, or a sheriff, deputy sheriff, municipal law enforcement officer, campus police officer as defined in § 49-7-118, internal affairs director or internal affairs special agent of the department of correction, or constable, subject only to the orders and decrees of the circuit or criminal court. When property is seized under part 3 of this chapter and this part, or title 39, chapter 17, part 4, the seizing authority may:

Place the property under seal;

Remove the property to a place designated by the seizing authority;

Require the director or the director's authorized representative, agent or employee, the commissioner or the commissioner's authorized representative, agent or employee, or a sheriff, deputy sheriff, municipal law enforcement officer, campus police officer as defined in § 49-7-118, internal affairs director or internal affairs special agent of the department of correction, or constable to take custody of the property and remove it to an appropriate location for disposition in accordance with law; or

Regardless of any other method of disposition of property contained in this chapter, use of the property taken or detained, with permission of the court and under such terms and conditions as are approved by the court, for use in the drug enforcement program of the county in which the goods are seized, or, with approval of the court having jurisdiction over the property, sell the property and utilize the proceeds for the drug enforcement program of the county in which the property was seized, or both.

In the case of property seized by the Tennessee bureau of investigation, the director of the bureau is authorized to designate, in writing, any part of the property for use by the bureau for any period of time, subject to inventory, management and disposition as provided by law.

In the case of an aircraft seized by the bureau, the director is also authorized to designate, in writing, any such property for transfer to and use by the department of general services subject to inventory, management and disposition as provided by law. If an aircraft is not sold, but is to be transferred to another state governmental entity, such transfer shall be approved by the commissioner of finance and administration.

The proceeds from any sale conducted under this chapter of forfeited property seized by the bureau and not designated for its use, or not transferred to the department of general services as provided in subdivision (d)(4)(B), shall be paid to the state treasurer to be used only as appropriated by the general assembly.

When property is forfeited under part 3 of this chapter and this part, or title 39, chapter 17, part 4, the director or the director's authorized representative, agent or employee, the commissioner of safety or the commissioner's authorized representative, agent or employee, or a sheriff, deputy sheriff, municipal law enforcement officer, campus police officer as defined in § 49-7-118, internal affairs director or internal affairs special agent of the department of correction, or constable shall remove it for disposition in accordance with law.

Controlled substances listed in Schedule I that are possessed, transferred, sold, or offered for sale in violation of part 3 of this chapter and this part, or title 39, chapter 17, part 4, are contraband and shall be seized and summarily forfeited to the state. Controlled substances listed in Schedule I that are seized or come into the possession of the state, the owners of which are unknown, are contraband and shall be summarily forfeited to the state.

Species of plants from which controlled substances in Schedules I, II and VI may be derived that have been planted or cultivated in violation of part 3 of this chapter and this part, or title 39, chapter 17, part 4, or of which the owners or cultivators are unknown, or that are wild growths, may be seized and summarily forfeited to the state.

Controlled substance analogues that are possessed, transferred, sold, or offered for sale in violation of part 3 of this chapter and this part, or title 39, chapter 17, part 4, are contraband and shall be seized and summarily forfeited to the state. Controlled substance analogues that are seized or come into the possession of the state, the owners of which are unknown, are contraband and shall be summarily forfeited to the state.

The failure, upon demand by the commissioner of safety, the commissioner's authorized representative, agent or employee, or a sheriff, deputy sheriff, municipal law enforcement officer, campus police officer as defined in § 49-7-118, internal affairs director or internal affairs special agent of the department of correction, or constable, of the person in occupancy or in control of land or premises upon which the species of plants are growing or being stored, to produce an appropriate registration, or proof that such person is the holder thereof, constitutes authority for the seizure and forfeiture of the plants.

Confiscation proceedings under part 3 of this chapter and this part, or title 39, chapter 17, part 4, shall be conducted in accordance with part 2 of this chapter.

Any property of the type set forth in subdivisions (a)(1) and (7) that is in the custody and possession of a clerk of any court of this state by virtue of the property having been held as evidence or exhibits in any criminal prosecution where all appeals or potential appeals of a judgment have ended, or when the case has been dismissed or otherwise brought to a conclusion, shall be disposed of as follows:

The clerk of the court having custody of the property to be disposed of shall, no less than once annually, inventory the property and prepare a list of the property proposed to be destroyed with references to the cases involved and the name of the case, the case number and date when the property was used;

The clerk shall submit the inventory list with a filed petition to the court and shall serve a copy of the petition upon the district attorney general. After determining that the listed property is not needed as evidence in any pending or potential judicial proceeding, the court shall order the property to be destroyed; and

The clerk, or a deputy clerk that the clerk may designate, shall completely destroy each item by cutting, crushing, burning or melting and shall file, together with the petition and order relating to the destroyed property, an affidavit concerning the destruction, showing a description of each item, the method of destruction, the date and place of destruction, and the names and addresses of all witnesses to the destruction.

Acts 1971, ch. 163, § 36; 1972, ch. 597, § 12; 1973, ch. 134, § 1; 1981, ch. 512, § 2; 1982, ch. 742, § 1; T.C.A., § 52-1443; Acts 1983, ch. 412, § 4; 1984, ch. 1005, § 4; 1986, ch. 783, § 1; 1989, ch. 192, § 1; T.C.A., § 53-11-409; Acts 1994, ch. 925, § 2; 2007, ch. 106, §§ 7-9; 2010, ch. 1040, §§ 6-8; 2012, ch. 848, §§ 48, 49.

Compiler's Notes. The controlled substances schedules, referred to in this section, appear in title 39, ch. 17, part 4.

Amendments. The 2010 amendment inserted “internal affairs director or internal affairs special agent of the department of correction,” in the introductory paragraphs of (b) and (d) and in (b)(3), (b)(4), (d)(3), (e) and (h); substituted “such terms and conditions as are approved” for “the terms and conditions approved” in (d)(4); and substituted “such person is the holder thereof” for “the person is the holder of appropriate registration” in (h).

The 2012 amendment, in (a), inserted “or controlled substance analogues” in (1), and inserted “or controlled substance analogue” in (2) and (6)(A); added (h); and redesignated former (h)-(j) as present (i)-(k), respectively.

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 1040, § 11. June 11, 2010.

Acts 2012, ch. 848, § 99. May 15, 2012.

Cross-References. Accountability for disposition of fines and forfeitures, § 39-17-429.

Confiscation of drugs, title 53, ch. 11, part 2.

Determination whether object is drug paraphernalia, § 39-17-424.

Disposition of proceeds, § 53-11-204.

Drug Control Act, title 39, ch. 17, part 4 and title 53, ch. 11, parts 3 and 4.

Drug crimes, fines and forfeitures, § 39-17-420.

Procedure for confiscation of property in cases of seizure of narcotic drugs or marijuana, § 53-11-201.

Procedure for seizing contraband in cases of seizure of tobacco products, § 67-4-1021.

Procedure for seizing contraband property in cases of seizure of alcoholic beverages, § 57-9-202.

Promulgation of rules, § 40-33-214.

Real property subject to forfeiture, § 53-11-452.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), §§ 18.5, 18.237.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 20 Tenn. Juris., Penalties and Forfeitures, § 2.

Law Reviews.

Asset Forfeiture in Practice: Legislative Reform and Financial Considerations (Patricia S. Wall and Lee Sarver), 37 No. 4 Tenn. B.J. 24 (2001).

Forfeitures Under the Tennessee Drug Control Act (Lewis L. Laska), 16 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 431 (1986).

Attorney General Opinions. The effect of the filing of a federal bankruptcy petition upon the commencement or continuation of confiscation proceedings against the individual filing for bankruptcy, OAG 91-62 (7/3/91).

Vehicle forfeiture for violation of T.C.A. § 39-17-418, OAG 93-46 (5/13/93).

Use of drug fines, forfeitures of appearance bonds and the proceeds of property forfeitures to fund salaries of persons employed by county and municipal law enforcement agencies, OAG 99-202 (10/6/99).

Member agencies of the Tennessee association of chiefs of police may use one percent of the funds received from drug forfeitures to pay the expenses of outside speakers and trainers participating in a continuous training program for the benefit of all municipal law enforcement agencies, provided such expenditures are not for supplementing salaries of public employees or law enforcement officers or for long-term obligations that recur, including salaries, OAG 02-130 (12/02/02).

A conveyance is not subject to seizure or forfeiture if its only provable connection to a controlled substance is as a means of facilitating simple possession or casual exchange of the substance, delivery of one half ounce or less of marijuana, or possession, manufacture, or delivery of drug paraphernalia, OAG 03-133 (10/08/03).

A vehicle is subject to seizure or forfeiture even if the person with the controlled substance is the passenger in a vehicle, OAG 03-133 (10/08/03).

If the driver/owner of the vehicle shows he did not know that the passenger was violating Tennessee drug laws, then the vehicle is not subject to forfeiture, OAG 03-133 (10/08/03).

This section authorizes the seizure or forfeiture of conveyances used to facilitate the simple possession or casual exchange of a controlled substance other than marijuana, such as cocaine or methamphetamines, OAG 03-133 (10/08/03).

Use of proceeds from the sale of property forfeited for violations of the Drug Control Act. OAG 11-62, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 64 (8/25/11).

Cited: Goldsmith v. Roberts, 622 S.W.2d 438, 1981 Tenn. App. LEXIS 541 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1981); State v. Jennette, 706 S.W.2d 614, 1986 Tenn. LEXIS 824 (Tenn. 1986); State v. Bouldin, 717 S.W.2d 584, 1986 Tenn. LEXIS 791 (Tenn. 1986); Payne v. Breuer, 891 S.W.2d 200, 1994 Tenn. LEXIS 380 (Tenn. 1994); Pinnix v. Pollock, 338 F. Supp. 2d 885, 2004 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 20521 (W.D. Tenn. 2004).

53-11-452. Real property subject to forfeiture due to illegal drug-related activities — Procedure.

The following real property shall be subject to forfeiture to the state and no property right shall exist in the property:

All real property, including any right, title and interest in the whole of or any part of any lot or tract of land and any appurtenances or improvements that is used in any manner or part either to commit a violation of § 39-17-417(i) or (j), or in the commission of three (3) or more acts occurring on three (3) or more separate days within a sixty-day period, and each act results in a felony conviction under title 39, chapter 17, part 4; and

Any real property, including any right, title and interest in the whole of or any part of any lot or tract of land and any appurtenances or improvements that is acquired with the proceeds of a violation of title 39, chapter 17, part 4, constituting a felony, shall be subject to forfeiture and no property right shall exist in the property.

No interest in real property shall be forfeited under this section, unless the holder is convicted of a crime or crimes described in subdivision (a)(1)(A) or (a)(1)(B), subject to subsection (d).

Upon the entry of an order of forfeiture in favor of the state, the title of the state to the forfeited property shall relate back to the date of filing of the notice of lis pendens in the office of the register of deeds of the county in which the property or the beneficial interest is located.

When a lis pendens is filed concerning property pursuant to this section, a forfeiture proceeding shall be instituted within sixty (60) days in the circuit or chancery court of the county where the property is located.

The complaint shall state a deed description of the property to be forfeited and the reasons for forfeiture under this section.

The complaint shall also name as defendants all persons having an interest in the property as reflected in public records.

The rules of civil procedure shall apply to proceedings under this section, and any named defendant may demand a jury trial in the appropriate circuit or chancery court.

The district attorney general for the judicial district in which the real property lies or the attorney general and reporter shall institute all civil proceedings under this section.

The district attorney general or the attorney general and reporter shall, prior to the filing or concurrent to the filing of a civil forfeiture suit, file a lis pendens in the county where the real property is located to assert an interest of record on behalf of the state in the real property subject to this section.

The failure of the district attorney general or attorney general and reporter to file a lien lis pendens shall not raise any defense on the part of any party named in the civil suit.

In any action brought under this section, the circuit or chancery court shall proceed as soon as practicable to the hearing and determination.

The state shall have the burden of proving beyond a reasonable doubt that the property was used in a manner making it subject to forfeiture or was acquired with proceeds that make it subject to forfeiture under this section. Failure to carry the burden of proof shall operate as a bar to any forfeiture under this section.

In order to obtain a forfeiture of a holder's interest in real property, the state must establish:

The prior conviction or convictions of the holder; or

If an entity other than a natural person, the conviction or convictions of the holder's officer, employee or agent.

If the holder's officer, employee or agent, but not the holder, has been convicted, then the state shall also have the burden to establish beyond a reasonable doubt the additional requirements in subdivision (d)(3), for forfeiture of the holder's interest.

The interest of a holder, if an entity other than a natural person, shall be subject to forfeiture if any of the following have been convicted:

The holder of the interest; or

The holder's officer, employee or agent, if:

The conviction is based on acts by the person in the course of and within the scope of the person's employment; and

The holder knew, or had reason to know from information in the holder's possession, other than through its convicted officer, employee or agent, of the criminal nature of the acts.

The filing of an indictment, presentment or information alleging a violation of title 39, chapter 17, part 4 that is also related to a civil forfeiture proceeding under this section, shall stay the civil forfeiture proceeding.

The stay shall cease upon the termination of the trial of any criminal proceedings related to the forfeiture sought under this section.

Upon motion of the state and for good cause shown, the district attorney general or the attorney general and reporter may obtain an order that removes the stay from the court in which the forfeiture proceeding is pending.

Subject to the limitations of subsection (g), nothing in this section shall limit or restrict the right of a secured party possessing an interest in the property that was of record, prior to the filing of the notice of lien lis pendens, to enforce its deed of trust or to take any other action permitted under its deed of trust.

If a notice of lien lis pendens has been filed prior to the filing of a civil action, the secured party shall give the district attorney general or attorney general and reporter who filed the lis pendens notice of any action taken under the mortgage or deed of trust. The secured party may not exercise its right to foreclose its deed of trust on the property, unless it gives the district attorney general or attorney general and reporter written notice at least twenty (20) days prior to the date of a foreclosure sale and indicates the time, date and place of sale and the balance owing on the debt. Upon receipt of the notice of foreclosure, the district attorney general or attorney general and reporter may apply to the circuit or chancery court to enjoin the foreclosure sale.

Upon completion of a foreclosure sale, the secured party or the secured party's trustee shall notify the district attorney general or attorney general and reporter in writing of the distribution of the proceeds of the sale. The secured party shall hold any proceeds in excess of the debt and fees and expenses secured by its deed of trust of the sale for a period of twenty (20) days. The district attorney general or attorney general and reporter may apply to the circuit or chancery court for an order directing the secured party to pay the overage proceeds into the court, subject to a civil action based on the notice of lien lis pendens.

Notwithstanding a stay in the civil proceeding, or during pendency of the case, a secured party or the secured party's trustee may apply to the court to foreclose its mortgage or deed of trust on the property.

In the event that a district attorney general or the attorney general and reporter has probable cause to believe that any individual having a right to enter the property is engaged in any act that will result in diminution of the value of the property to the state, then the district attorney general or the attorney general and reporter may obtain an injunction from the court in which the forfeiture proceeding is pending, enjoining any action diminishing the value of the property.

Whenever property is forfeited under this section, the court may require the director of the Tennessee bureau of investigation or the director's authorized representative, agent or employee, the commissioner of safety or the commissioner's authorized representative, agent or employee, or a sheriff, deputy sheriff, municipal law enforcement officer, campus police officer as defined in § 49-7-118, internal affairs director or internal affairs special agent of the department of correction, constable, or clerk of the court or special master to sell the property at a public auction, subject to an order of the court. Whenever property is forfeited under this section, the court may also, if appropriate, require that the department of general services take custody of the property and dispose of it at a public auction, subject to an order of the court.

The court, in lieu of a sale as provided in subdivision (g)(1), may order that the property be sold by any person having an interest in the real property whose interest has not been forfeited. The proceeds of the sale shall be subject to an order of the court.

If the court orders a property interest in property owned as tenants in common forfeited under this section to be sold, whether by a public official as provided in subdivision (g)(1) or by a person having an interest in the property as in subdivision (g)(2), the innocent spouse of a person whose property interest has been forfeited shall have the same right to the property interest as granted an innocent spouse in subdivision (g)(4) or (g)(5). If there is no spouse or if the spouse does not elect to pursue the rights provided in subdivision (g)(4) or (g)(5), then any other person or persons whose interest in the property has not been forfeited shall have the first right to purchase the forfeited interest for its fair market value prior to the court ordered sale. In order to exercise the first right to purchase, the person or persons must petition the appropriate circuit or chancery court at least fifteen (15) days prior to the date the court ordered sale is to be conducted. If the person or persons do not purchase the forfeited property, the sale shall be conducted as provided by law.

For the purposes of subdivision (g)(3)(A), “fair market value” is determined by taking an average of three (3) appraisals conducted by separate and qualified real estate appraisers selected by the court. Before the purchase, the court shall approve the average of the appraisals for fair market value as reasonable.

Notwithstanding subdivision (g)(3) to the contrary, if a court orders property forfeited under this section pursuant to subdivision (g)(1) or (g)(2) and the property is held through tenancy by the entirety and one (1) spouse's interest is not forfeited, then the spouse shall have the first right to purchase the forfeited expectancy interest in the property.

A spouse purchasing the forfeited property interest in the manner described in subdivision (g)(4)(A) shall take the property subject to all bona fide liens on the property. In order to exercise the right of purchase, the spouse shall petition the court in which the forfeiture proceeding is pending for the purchase at least fifteen (15) days prior to the court ordered sale.

If the spouse does not purchase the forfeited expectancy interest, the spouse shall retain the spouse's interest subject to all bona fide liens, and the forfeited expectancy interest shall be sold and the proceeds applied in the following manner:

Reasonable expenses of the proceedings for forfeiture and sale, including, but not limited to, expenses, seizure, maintenance of custody, advertising and court costs; and

The remaining proceeds shall be distributed as provided in subdivision (h)(2).

If a party possessing a security interest in property being held by an innocent spouse institutes proceedings pursuant to its deed of trust, or otherwise, that results in the foreclosure and sale of the property, the innocent spouse shall be entitled to receive from the first proceeds of the sale an amount equal to an elective share as provided in § 31-4-101, subject to bona fide outstanding liens not satisfied by the remainder of the proceeds.

If the innocent spouse predeceases the other spouse, if there are children of the innocent and guilty spouse, at least one (1) of whom is eighteen (18) years of age or younger on the date of the sale, and if the entity holding the right of expectancy is the state, then upon the sale of the property, one-third (1/3) of the proceeds from the sale shall be allocated and divided equally among all the children, subject to all outstanding bona fide liens not satisfied by the remainder of the proceeds.

Notwithstanding subdivision (g)(3) to the contrary, if the property subject to forfeiture under this section is property titled solely in the name of a guilty spouse or titled in the name of the guilty spouse as tenants in common with any other person or persons, the innocent spouse may petition the court, at least thirty (30) days prior to the court ordered forfeiture sale, to have the court vest the ownership of the property in the couple as tenants by the entirety, and the innocent spouse shall have the same rights as provided in subdivision (g)(4). If the petition is timely filed, it shall be granted.

The filing of the petition shall act as a stay of any court ordered sale of the property and the stay shall remain in effect until disposition is made of the petition.

If the innocent spouse does not petition the court to vest the property ownership in the couple as tenants by the entirety, then the property shall be forfeited and disposed of as provided by this section.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, the proceeds derived from the sale of property forfeited because it was acquired with the proceeds of a violation of title 39, chapter 17, part 4 shall be distributed solely as provided in subsection (h).

The proceeds from any sale under subsection (g) shall be applied first to all reasonable expenses of the proceedings for forfeiture and sale, including, but not limited to, expenses, seizure, maintenance of custody, advertising, and court costs, and second to the satisfaction of all bona fide liens on the property. These liens and expenses shall be paid out of the proceeds before any allocation of proceeds required by subdivision (h)(2).

Any proceeds received by any state agency pursuant to this section shall be allocated as follows:

Fifty percent (50%) of all proceeds resulting from actions of any state agency or awarded the agency in a division of funds shall be paid to the state treasurer to be used only for agency purposes as appropriated by the general assembly;

There is created a special fund in the state treasury to be known as the special drug case investigation fund. Ten percent (10%) of all proceeds from any sale under this section shall be ordered paid into this fund by the court.

This fund shall finance investigations of complex drug offense cases by the Tennessee bureau of investigation and the attorney general and reporter involving civil forfeitures pursuant to title 39, chapter 12, part 2, or this section.

This fund shall not revert to the general fund on any June 30, but shall remain available for expenditure for its intended purposes.

The attorney general and reporter is authorized to call on the assistance of the Tennessee bureau of investigation in the civil investigation of complex drug cases involving civil forfeiture proceedings brought by the bureau and the attorney general and reporter pursuant to title 39, chapter 12, part 2, or this section.

The Tennessee bureau of investigation is authorized to provide assistance to the attorney general and reporter as required for the civil investigation of complex drug cases involving civil forfeiture proceedings brought by the bureau and the attorney general and reporter pursuant to title 39, chapter 12, part 2, or this section.

Forty percent (40%) of all proceeds resulting from actions of any state agency or awarded the agency in a division of funds shall be paid to the state treasurer to be used only for the purpose of providing additional funds for the operation, maintenance and construction of prisons under the control of the department of correction as appropriated by the general assembly; and

Ten percent (10%) of the proceeds shall be paid to the special drug case investigation fund created in subsection (j).

(i) Any proceeds received or produced as a result of the activities of a law enforcement agency of a local government shall be paid into the treasury of the respective local government. These proceeds may be appropriated by the local governmental body for any public purpose allowed by law. For purposes of this section, “local government” means a city, county or county with a metropolitan form of government. Any purchase made with these proceeds shall be made in accordance with all purchasing laws applicable to the particular local government.

Subdivision (h)(2)(B)(i) regarding any purchase made with the proceeds being in accordance with purchasing laws does not apply in any county having a metropolitan form of government and a population in excess of five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

If more than one (1) law enforcement agency or department is involved in a seizure, then the court may divide the proceeds of property seized under this section among the agencies or departments involved in the seizure.

Acts 1990, ch. 774, § 1; 1997, ch. 56, §§ 6, 7; 2007, ch. 106, § 10; 2010, ch. 1040, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2010 amendment inserted “internal affairs director or internal affairs special agent of the department of correction,” in the first sentence of (g)(1).

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 1040, § 11. June 11, 2010.

Cross-References. Confiscation procedure in cases involving seizure of narcotic drugs or marijuana, § 53-11-201.

Disposition of proceeds, § 53-11-204.

Drug Control Act, title 39, ch. 17, part 4 and title 53, ch. 11, parts 3 and 4.

Drug crimes, fines and forfeitures, § 39-17-420.

Goods subject to forfeiture, § 53-11-451.

Collateral References.

Burden of proof and presumptions in tracing currency, bank account, or cash equivalent to illegal drug trafficking so as to permit forfeiture, or declaration as contraband, under state law. 104 A.L.R.5th 229.

Validity, construction, and application of state or local law prohibiting maintenance of vehicle for purpose of keeping or selling controlled substances. 31 A.L.R.5th 760.

Validity and construction of state statutes criminalizing the act of permitting real property to be used in connection with illegal drug activities. 24 A.L.R.5th 428.

53-11-451. Goods subject to forfeiture — Seizure — Disposition.